Georgia, session 2025_26, HB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to registration and
licensing of motor vehicles, is amended in Code Section 40-2-86.1, relating to license plates
promoting or supporting certain agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations or issued to
qualified motor vehicles or owners with proceeds deposited in the general fund, by revising
paragraph (7) of subsection (l) as follows:
"(7)(A) A special license plate to be issued for alternative fueled vehicles, which
license plate shall be similar in design to the license plate issued to all other residents
of this state except that the commissioner shall place a distinctive logo or emblem on
the license plate which shall distinguish the vehicle as an alternative fueled vehicle
H. B. 261
- 1 -

LC 39 4561
eligible to travel in travel lanes designated for such vehicles under paragraph (4) of
subsection (a) of Code Section 32-9-4. The words 'alternative fueled vehicle' shall be
imprinted on such special license plate in lieu of the county name decal. The funds
raised by the sale of this license plate shall be deposited in the general fund.
(B) As used in this paragraph, the term:
(i) 'Alternative fuel' means electricity, natural gas, and propane.
(ii) 'Alternative fueled vehicle' means any vehicle fueled solely by alternative fuel as
defined in division (i) of this subparagraph, bi-fuel, or dual fuel.
(C) Pursuant to paragraph (19) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-2-151, the
applicant for a special license plate for any alternative fueled vehicle shall provide
proof that he or she has paid the registration fee prescribed therein prior to the issuance
of any special license plate under this paragraph. Upon showing proof of such
payment, any fees associated with the issuance, manufacture, and renewal of such
special license plate shall be waived."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 40-2-151, relating to annual license fees for
operation of vehicles, fee for permanent licensing of certain trailers, and fee for new
passenger car with paid title ad valorem taxes, by revising paragraph (19) of subsection (a)
as follows:
"(19)(A)(i) Upon registration of an alternative fueled vehicle not operated
for commercial purposes . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 200.00
(ii) Upon registration of an alternative fueled vehicle operated for
commercial purposes . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 300.00
(iii) Upon registration of an alternative fueled vehicle that is a low-speed
vehicle . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 100.00
H. B. 261
- 2 -

LC 39 4561
(B)(i) As used in this paragraph, the term 'alternative fueled vehicle' shall
have the same meaning as in division (l)(7)(B)(ii) of Code Section 40-2-86.1;
provided, however, that the fees in this paragraph shall not be assessed on
vehicles which operate primarily on compressed natural gas, liquefied
natural gas, or liquefied petroleum gas.
(ii) The fees in this paragraph shall be in addition to any other fee imposed
on the vehicle by this Code section.
(iii) The fees in this paragraph shall be automatically adjusted on an annual
basis by multiplying the percentage of increase or decrease in fuel efficiency
from the previous year as measured by using the average of combined miles
per gallon published in the United States Department of Energy Fuel
Economy Guide against the current fee, and the resulting increase or
decrease shall be added or subtracted from the fee. This preliminary fee
adjustment shall then be multiplied by the increase or decrease in the
Consumer Price Index percentage for the applicable year, and the result will
be added or subtracted from the preliminary fee to produce the fee for the
year reducing the fee by 5 percent annually until such fee equals zero. The
first adjustment shall be calculated and implemented on July 1, 2016 2026."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 261
- 3 -